Louisiana, session 2026, HB586.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:95.11 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§95.11. Allowing a minor child to access to a readily dischargeable firearm
A. No person shall fail to secure or leave a readily dischargeable firearm in
a place where the person knew or reasonably should have known that a minor child
could gain access to the readily dischargeable firearm and, as a result, a minor child
obtains possession of the readily dischargeable firearm and does either of the
following:
(1) Discharges the firearm and causes death or bodily injury to himself or
another person.
(2) Exhibits the firearm in a threatening, careless, or angry manner in a
public building, public place, or school as defined by R.S. 40:1291.3.
B. Whoever violates the provisions of this Section shall be imprisoned for
not more than six months, fined not more than one thousand dollars, or both.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1240 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 586
C. The provisions of this Section do not apply in any of the following
circumstances:
(1) When a minor child unlawfully enters a dwelling or vehicle and takes or
misappropriates the firearm.
(2) When a minor child obtains access to and uses the firearm for the
purpose of hunting or sporting activities.
(3) When a minor child accesses a firearm to engage in the lawful defense
of a person or property.
(4) When a person is carrying a firearm on his person.
D. No peace officer nor any other person shall arrest a person for a violation
of this Section before the seventh day following the date when the offense is alleged
to have been committed if both of the following circumstances exist:
(1) The offender is a member of the family of the minor child who
discharged the firearm.
(2) The minor child has caused death or serious injury to himself through
discharge of the firearm.
E. For the purposes of this Section, the following terms have the following
meanings:
(1) "Firearm" means any pistol, revolver, rifle, shotgun, machine gun,
submachine gun, or block powder weapon, that is designed to fire or is capable of
firing fixed cartridge ammunition or from which a shot or projectile is discharged by
an explosive.
(2) "Minor child" means a person who is fifteen years of age or younger.
(3) "Readily dischargeable firearm" means a firearm that is loaded with
ammunition, whether or not a round is in the chamber.
(4) "Secure" means to take the steps of a reasonable person under the
circumstances to prevent a minor child from accessing a readily dischargeable
firearm. For purposes of this Section, "secure" includes but is not limited to the
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1240 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 586
placing of a firearm in a locked container or temporarily rendering the firearm
inoperable by a trigger lock or other means.
Section 2. This Act shall be cited and referred to as "Noah's Law".